Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2330
Retirement system; adoption; certification; list of eligible employees to retirement board.

Upon the adoption of the retirement system by the county board, the county clerk shall certify such action to the retirement board. Upon the adoption of the retirement system by the county board or by January 1, 1987, whichever is earlier, the county clerk shall submit to the board a list of all employees then eligible for participation in the plan, which list shall state the name and address of the employee and his or her gross monthly wage.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 30, p. 410;

Laws 1967, c. 133, § 1, p. 418;

Laws 1973, LB 216, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 45, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 347, § 17;

Laws 1985, LB 432, § 4.